Hawaii, session 2026, HB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[PART VII.]  NEIGHBORHOOD BOARD [[]§92-81[]]  Neighborhood board; notice and agenda; public input; quorum.  (a)  Any contrary provision in this chapter notwithstanding, the provisions of this part shall apply to neighborhood boards overseen by a neighborhood commission of the city and county of Honolulu, and such other neighborhood boards as may be created in other counties and overseen by a county-based commission. (b) The agenda required to be included in written public notice of a neighborhood board meeting may include an opportunity for the board to receive public input on issues not specifically noticed for consideration at the forthcoming meeting. (c) Any matter raised as part of the public input agenda allowed under subsection (b) may be discussed and information on the matter may be received by the board at the meeting; provided that the board shall not make a decision relating to the matter.  The board may make decisions on matters originally raised as part of a public input agenda only at a later meeting, where the agenda for the meeting shall give notice of decision-making on the matter. (d) A quorum for a meeting of a neighborhood board shall be required for: (1)  Conducting official board business; (2)  Discussions prior to and related to voting; and (3)  Voting required to validate an act of the board as part of official board business. A neighborhood board may receive information or testimony on a matter of official board business without a quorum; provided that the board shall not make a decision on the issue. The board members, at the next meeting of the neighborhood board, shall report the matters presented as information or testimony. (e)  The neighborhood commission of the city and county of Honolulu and such other county-based commissions, shall serve as the respective oversight authorities for application of this chapter to neighborhood boards." SECTION 2.  Section 92-83, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§92-83[]]  Neighborhood board meeting; unanticipated events; public interest; official reports. (a)  An unanticipated event that occurs after public notice of a neighborhood board meeting has been issued, but before the scheduled meeting, may be the subject of discussion at the scheduled meeting if timely action on the matter is necessary for public health, welfare, and safety.  At a duly noticed meeting, a board may take action on an unanticipated event in the public interest that is not on the agenda in the same manner as if the board had held an emergency meeting to take action on the issue, pursuant to section 92-8. (b) A board may discuss an official government report that is not on the agenda at a meeting; provided that the board shall not make a decision relating to the report.  The board may make decisions relating to the report only at a later meeting, where the agenda for the meeting shall give notice of decision-making on the matter relating to the report." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________